New York, session 2025-2026, A6669.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to 2 the contrary an applicant for the cooling assistance component of the 3 home energy assistance program shall not be required to demonstrate that 4 the household contains at least one person with a documented medical 5 condition that is exacerbated by extreme heat to be eligible for a cool- 6 ing assistance component benefit. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after the state 8 commissioner of social services receives a determination from the feder- 9 al department of health and human services that the provisions of 10 section one of this act shall not render the state ineligible for 11 participation in the federal low-income home energy assistance program; 12 provided that the state commissioner of social services shall notify the 13 legislative bill drafting commission upon the receipt of such determi- 14 nation in order that the commission may maintain an accurate and timely 15 effective data base of the official text of the laws of the state of New 16 York in furtherance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the 17 legislative law and section 70-b of the public officers law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08673-01-5